Arkansas, session 2025, HB1615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-123-601 is amended to read as follows:
16-123-601. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to prohibit:
(1) Prohibit government discrimination against religious
organizations based upon the religious organizations’ religious identity or
conduct;
(2) Prohibit the government from discriminating against certain
individuals and organizations because of their beliefs regarding marriage or
what it means to be female or male; and
(3) Ensure that individuals and organizations cannot be
compelled, either by the government or through a lawsuit initiated by a
private party, to engage in conduct that conflicts with their beliefs or be
punished or discriminated against for declining to engage in conduct that
conflicts with their beliefs.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-123-602(1)(C), concerning an action
taken by the government that constitutes a "discriminatory action" as the
*CEB133*
03-31-2025 11:34:20 CEB133

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/11/25 H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1615
term is used regarding religious nondiscrimination, is amended to read as
follows:
(C) Withhold, reduce, exclude, terminate, materially alter
the terms or conditions of, or otherwise make unavailable, including by
inserting contractual provisions that contradict a person's sincerely held
religious beliefs, or deny any state grant, state benefit program, contract,
subcontract, cooperative agreement, guarantee, loan, scholarship, or other
similar benefit from or to such person;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-123-602, concerning the definitions used
regarding religious nondiscrimination, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(6) "Belief about biological sex or marriage" means a belief
based on religious or philosophical premises:
(A) Regarding the sex of two (2) individuals who may enter
into marriage; or
(B) That "male" or "man" or "female" or "woman" refers
exclusively to a person's immutable biological sex as objectively determined
by anatomy and genetics at the time of birth;
(7) "License-seeking student" means a person who is in an
educational institution in the state for the purpose of obtaining the
necessary educational requirements to engage in an occupation or profession
that is licensed or certified by state government; and
(8) "Occupational organization" means an entity of which a
person or license-seeking student must be a member in order to engage in a
specified occupation or profession within the state, including an entity for
which exclusion from the entity would substantially impair a person's ability
to engage in the occupation or profession.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 123, Subchapter 6, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
16-123-606. Degrees, licensure, and certification.
(a) The state government shall license or certify any person that
would otherwise be licensed or certified, respectively, for any purposes
under state law but for a determination against the person wholly or
partially on the basis that the person believes, maintains policies and
03-31-2025 11:34:20 CEB133

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/11/25 H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1615
procedures, or acts in accordance with a sincerely held religious belief,
including a belief about biological sex or marriage unless it is demonstrated
that refusal of the license or certification of the person in this particular
instance is:
(1) Essential to further a compelling governmental interest; and
(2) The least restrictive means of furthering that compelling
governmental interest.
(b) The state government shall not revoke, decline to renew, or
decline to grant a college or graduate degree, license, or certification to a
person based upon the inability of the person to assist or provide
professional services to a client or potential client in pursuit of goals,
outcomes, or behaviors that conflict with a sincerely held religious belief
held by the person unless it is demonstrated that the revocation, declination
to renew or grant a college or graduate degree, license, or certification of
that person in this particular instance is:
(1) Essential to further a compelling governmental interest; and
(2) The least restrictive means of furthering that compelling
governmental interest.
(c) As a condition of obtaining or maintaining a college or graduate
degree, license, or certification to engage in certain occupations or
professions, the state government shall not require a person to be a member
of any occupational organization that requires its members to assist or
provide professional services to a client or potential client in pursuit of
goals, outcomes, or behaviors that conflict with a sincerely held religious
belief held by the person unless it is demonstrated that the requirement that
the person be a member of the occupational organization in this particular
instance is:
(1) Essential to further a compelling governmental interest; and
(2) The least restrictive means of furthering that compelling
governmental interest.
(d) A public educational institution within the state shall not
require a license-seeking student to assist or provide services to a client
or potential client in pursuit of goals, outcomes, or behaviors that conflict
with the student's sincerely held religious belief unless it is demonstrated
that the requirement that the person assist or provide services in this
particular instance is:
03-31-2025 11:34:20 CEB133

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/11/25 H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1615
(1) Essential to further a compelling governmental interest; and
(2) The least restrictive means of furthering that compelling
governmental interest.
(e) This section does not limit any other rights or protections
afforded to a person or a license-seeking student under the Arkansas
Constitution, the United States Constitution, state law, or state regulatory
authority.

16-123-607. Beliefs regarding biological sex or marriage.
(a) The state government shall not take any discriminatory action
against a religious organization or person wholly or partially on the basis
that the religious organization or person:
(1) Solemnizes or declines to solemnize any marriage, or
provides or declines to provide services, accommodations, facilities, goods,
or privileges for a purpose related to the solemnization, formation,
celebration, or recognition of any marriage, based upon or in a manner
consistent with a belief about biological sex or marriage; or
(2) Makes any employment-related decision, including a decision
whether to hire, terminate, or discipline a person whose conduct or religious
beliefs are inconsistent with those of the religious organization, based upon
or in a manner consistent with a belief about biological sex or marriage.
(b) The state government shall not take any discriminatory action
against a person wholly or partially on the basis that the person:
(1) Has provided or declined to provide the following services,
accommodations, facilities, goods, or privileges for a purpose related to the
solemnization, formation, celebration, or recognition of any marriage, based
upon or in a manner consistent with a belief about biological sex or
marriage:
(A) Photography, poetry, videography, disc jockey
services, wedding planning, printing, web design, graphic design, publishing,
counseling, or similar marriage-related goods or services; or
(B) Floral arrangements, dress making, cake or pastry
artistry, assembly hall or other wedding venue rentals, car or other vehicle
service rentals, jewelry sales and services, or similar marriage-related
services, accommodations, facilities, or goods; or
(2) Maintains separate dress codes, restrooms, spas, baths,
03-31-2025 11:34:20 CEB133

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/11/25 H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1615
showers, dressing rooms, locker rooms, or other intimate facilities or
settings based on biological sex.
(c) The state government shall not take any discriminatory action
against a state government employee wholly or partially on the basis that the
state government employee lawfully speaks or engages in expressive conduct
based upon or in a manner consistent with a belief about biological sex or
marriage if the state government employee’s speech or expressive conduct
occurs:
(1) In the workplace consistent with the time, place, manner,
and frequency of any other expression of a religious, political, or moral
belief or conviction allowed and, within public institutions of higher
education, subject to reasonable policies established consistent with § 6-60-
1001 et seq. and § 6-60-1401 et seq.; or
(2) Outside the workplace in the employee’s personal capacity
and outside the course of performing work duties.
(d)(1) A person employed or acting on behalf of the state government
who has authority to authorize or license marriages, including without
limitation clerks, registers of deeds, or their deputies may seek recusal
from authorizing or licensing lawful marriages based upon or in a manner
consistent with a belief about biological sex or marriage.
(2) A person making a recusal request under subdivision (d)(1)
of this section shall provide prior written notice to the state government,
and the state government shall not take any discriminatory action against
that person wholly or partially on the basis of such recusal.
(3) Access to a constitutional right shall not be unduly
burdened by a governmental entity due to a recusal request made by a person
under subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(e)(1) A person employed or acting on behalf of the state government
who has authority to perform or solemnize marriages, including without
limitation to judges, magistrates, justices of the peace, or their deputies,
may seek recusal from performing or solemnizing lawful marriages based upon
or in a manner consistent with a belief about biological sex or marriage.
(2) Any person making a recusal request under subdivision (e)(1)
of this section shall provide prior written notice to the state government,
and the state government shall not take any discriminatory action against
that person wholly or partially on the basis of the recusal.
03-31-2025 11:34:20 CEB133

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/11/25 H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1615
(3) Access to a constitutional right shall not be unduly
burdened by a governmental entity due to a recusal request made by a person
under subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
/s/Lundstrum
































03-31-2025 11:34:20 CEB133